finished/ote.foma
def kRegular Verb [ ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{ga } |
	         ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gi } |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{stá } |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{xká } |
		 ["[PRF]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{stí } |
		 ["[PRF]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{xkí } |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{ndí }|
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{ngí }|
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{mí } |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{dí } |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{gí } |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:0    |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{dá }          |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gá }
		 ] kTOgLemmas ;

def kTOgFix k -> g || .#. (?) (?) (?) " " _ ;
def kTOg Verb [ ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{da } |
    	       ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{bi } |
	       ["[PRF]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{xki } |
	       ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:{xa }] kTOgLemmas .o. kTOgFix ;

def fLemmas {fa²s-te}|{fa²-ʔyo}|{fẹ²ta²-te}|{fọ²ge}|{fo²nt’i}|{fụ²x-hwä²hi} ;
def fLemmasRegular Verb [["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{ndí }|
		        ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{ngí }|
		        ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{mí } |
		        ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{dí } |
		        ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{gí } |
		        ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:0 ] fLemmas ;
			
def fTOmf Verb [ ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{ga m} |
	         ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gi m} |
		 ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{da m} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{stá m} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{xká m} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:{xa m}  |
		 ["[PRF]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{stí m} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{xkí m} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{xki m} |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{dá m}          |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gá m}          |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{bi m}] fLemmas ;

def fTOmonlyLemmas {fadi} | {fani} | {fati} | {fat’i} | {fats’i} | {fẹi} |
	       {fẹki} | {fẹʔmi} | {fẹti} | {fẹt’i} | {fẹʔtsi} | {fọt’e} | {fọts’e} | {fụ²di} | {fụti} ;

def fTOmRegular Verb [["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{ga } |
	               ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gi } |
		       ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{stá } |
		       ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{xká } |
		       ["[PRF]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{stí } |
		       ["[PRF]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{xkí } |
		       ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{ndí }|
		       ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{ngí }|
		       ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{mí } |
		       ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{dí } |
		       ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{gí } |
		       ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:0    |
		       ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{dá }          |
		       ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gá }] fTOmonlyLemmas ;
		       
def fTOmFix f -> m || .#. (?) (?) (?) " " _ ;
def fTOmonly Verb [ ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{da } |
    	            ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{bi } |
	            ["[PRF]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{xki } |
	            ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:{xa }] fTOmonlyLemmas .o. fTOmFix ;

def hTOhnLemmas {hä¹²mpi}|{hä¹²ts’i}|{hä²}|{hä²-thä}|{hä²ʔtsui}|{häʔti}|{he²t’ä-nthä¹²hi}|{he²t’i}|{hegi}|
{hei}|{heki}|{hembi}|{hen-thä¹²hi}|{hest’i}|{het’i}|{heʔtsi}|
{hu²-hme}|{hu²ʔmbi}|{hu²mụi}|{hụ²xi}|{huʔtsi}|{huts’i}|{hụ²xi} ;

def hTOhnFix h -> {hñ} || .#. (?) (?) (?) " " _  ;
def hTOhnVowelFixA a -> ä  || ñ _ ;
def hTOhnVowelFixE e -> ë  || ñ _ ;
def hTOhnVowelFixU u -> ü  || ñ _ ;
def hTOhn Verb  [ ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{ga } |
	         ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gi } |
		 ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{da } |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{stá } |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{xká } |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:{xa }  |
		 ["[PRF]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{stí } |
		 ["[PRF]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{xkí } |
		 ["[PRF]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{xki } |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{ndí }|
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{ngí }|
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{mí } |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{dí } |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{gí } |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:0    |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{dá }          |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gá }          |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{bi }] hTOhnLemmas .o. hTOhnFix .o. hTOhnVowelFixA .o. hTOhnVowelFixE .o. hTOhnVowelFixU  ;

def gLemmas {ga²ni} | {ga²-ʔnthä} | {gä²ʔtsi} | {ge²} | {go²fo} | {go²-gu} | {go²ne} ;

def gLemmasaddn Verb [ ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{ga n} |
	         ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gi n} |
		 ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{da n} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{stá n} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{xká n} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:{xa n}  |
		 ["[PRF]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{stí n} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{xkí n} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{xki n} |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{ndí }|
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{ngí }|
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{mí } |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{dí } |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{gí } |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:0    |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{dá n}          |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gá n}          |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{bi n}] gLemmas ;

def gsmixgsn {ä¹²tsi}|{ä¹²xi}|{a²fi}|{ä²hä}|{a²ka²-te}|{a²k-hñu²ni}|{a²k-sei}|{a²-ma²ñʔụ}|{a²n-sei}|{a²ʔ-thä}|{a²-the}|{ä²x-ʔyo}|{ägi}|{äkui}|{äni}|{e¹²di}|{e¹²nä}|{e¹²ts’i}|{e¹²tsua (ra² nsu)}|{e²-bru}|{e²gi}|{e²he}|{e²h-ya}|{e²k’ua¹²-mba}|{e²kua²bi}|{e² mbi¹²da}|{e²-ñä}|{ẹ²n-do}|{ẹ²n-sagi}|{ẹ²nt’a²-hme}|{ẹ²nte}|{ẹ²nts’a²-pa}|{ẹ²nts’a²-te}|{ẹ²te}|{ẹ²-ʔt-fi}|{e²t’i}|{e²ʔtsa²-te}|{e²ʔtsi}|{edi}|{ei}|{emei}|{eni}|{ẹ-ʔuada}|{o²k-jä}|{ọ²nä²-te}|{ọ²t’a²-ʔbai}|{ọ²t’a²-bu¹²hla}|{ọ²t’a²-ngo}|{o²-tho}|{o²xi}|{o-fa²di}|{u¹²di}|{u¹²st’i}|{u¹²t’i}|{ụ²-ngu}|{ụ²n-te}|{u²-spi}|{ụ²ta²-te}|{u²ʔ-thyä}|{ụi}|{upi}|{uʔtsi} ;

def gsmixgsnRules Verb [ ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{ga ʔ} |
	         ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gi ʔñ} |
		 ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{da ʔñ} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{stá ʔ} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{xká ʔñ} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:{xa ʔñ}  |
		 ["[PRF]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{stí ʔ} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{xkí ʔñ} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{xki ʔñ} |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{ndí ʔ}|
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{ngí ʔ}|
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{mí ʔ} |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{dí ʔ} |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{gí ʔ} |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:{ʔ}    |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{dá ʔ}          |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gá ʔñ}          |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{bi ʔñ}] gsmixgsn .o. eFix;

#Some lemmas that start with get an n for some paradigms
def dLemmas {dä²hñei}|{dä²nts’i}|{da²ʔthi}|{dẹ²-spi}|{do²-ʔyẹ} ;

def dStartAddN Verb [ ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{ga n} |
	         ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gi n} |
		 ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{da n} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{stá n} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{xká n} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:{xa n}  |
		 ["[PRF]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{stí n} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{xkí n} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{xki n} |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{ndí }|
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{ngí }|
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{mí } |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{dí } |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{gí } |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:0    |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{dá n}          |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gá n}          |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{bi n}] dLemmas ;

def hLemmas {ha¹²t’i}|{ha¹²ts’i}|{ha²ni}|{hahni}|{hant-hyä}|{he¹²ʔte}|{hẹ²hni}|{he²ke}|{hẹ²ki}|{he²te}|{hẹ²t’i}|{hẹ²ʔtsi}|{hẹgi}|{ho²ki}|{họ²ʔ-thä}|{họ²ts’e}|{hụ²ʔti}|{hụ²ʔtsi}|{hụst’i} ;

def hLemmasRegular Verb [["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{ga } |
		          ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{stá } |
		          ["[PRF]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{stí } |
		          ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{ndí }|
		          ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{ngí }|
		          ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{mí } |
		          ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{dí } |
		          ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{gí } |
		          ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:0    |
		          ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{dá }] hLemmas ;

def hTOhy h -> hy || .#. (?) (?) (?) " "  _ ;
def hTOhyRules Verb [["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gi } |
		 ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{da } |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{xká } |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:{xa }  |
	         ["[PRF]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{xkí } |
		 ["[PRF]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{xki } |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gá }   |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{bi }] hLemmas .o. hTOhy ;
		 
def pTOmpLemmas {pa²-dẹthä}|{pa²mʔi}|{pa²ʔ-nthä}|{pa²nthi}|{pọ²n-jụ} ;
def pTOmpRegular Verb [["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{ndí }|
		       ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{ngí }|
		       ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{mí } |
		       ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{dí } |
		       ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{gí } |
		       ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:0    ] pTOmpLemmas ;

def pTOmpRules Verb [ ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{ga m} |
	         ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gi m} |
		 ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{da m} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{stá m} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{xká m} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:{xa m}  |
		 ["[PRF]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{stí m} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{xkí m} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{xki m} |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{dá m}          |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gá m}          |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{bi m}] pTOmpLemmas ;

def thADDnLemmas {tsa²ʔni}|{tsa²n-te}|{ts’a²t’i}|{tsa²-ya}|{tsẹ²ka²-za¹²}|{tsẹ²-nza}|{tsẹ²-za}|{tsi²-ʔyụi}|{ts’ok’-ba²ha}|{tsụ¹²}|{tsụ¹²-jụ²mhai}|{tsụ²-dẹ²nxi}|{tsụ²mʔi}|{tsụ²-thä}|{tsụ²-t’yụi};

def thADDnRegular Verb [["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{ndí }|
		       ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{ngí }|
		       ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{mí } |
		       ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{dí } |
		       ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{gí } |
		       ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:0    ] thADDnLemmas ;

def thADDnRules Verb [ ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{ga n} |
	         ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gi n} |
		 ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{da n} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{stá n} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{xká n} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:{xa n}  |
		 ["[PRF]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{stí n} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{xkí n} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{xki n} |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{dá n}          |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gá n}          |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{bi n}] thADDnLemmas ;

def hLemmas2 {hä¹²ni}|{hä¹²xi}|{hä²kua²bi}|{hä²mbi}|{häi}|{häʔmi}|{he¹²}|{he²ʔti}|{hñä²mbä²-nt’ẹi}|{hu}|{hu¹²hni}|{hu²di}|{hu²ʔti}|{hyẹ¹²hẹ} ;

def hLemmas2nAFTERhRules Verb [ 
	         ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gi } |
		 ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{da } |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{xká } |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:{xa }  |
		 ["[PRF]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{xkí } |
		 ["[PRF]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{xki } |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gá }          |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{bi }] hLemmas2 .o. hTOhnFix  ;

def hLemmas2Regular Verb
    		    [["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{stá } |
		     ["[PRF]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{stí }        |
		     ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{dá }          |
		     ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{ga }          |
		     ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{ndí }|
		     ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{ngí }|
		     ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{mí } |
		     ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{dí } |
		     ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{gí } |
		     ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:0] hLemmas2 ;
		     
def addGSY2 {a¹²ni}|{a²ki}|{a²t’i}|{a²ʔtsi}|{adi}|{agi}|{aʔmi}|{ẹ²gi}|{ẹgi}|{ẹkua²bi}|{ẹnt’i}|{ẹnts’i}|{ẹts’i}|{o¹²ti}|{o¹²ts’i}|{ọ²ge}|{o²ki}|{ọ²ʔte}|{o²ʔtsi}|{ọde}|{ohni}|{ọni}|{ot’i}|{ọts’e}|{ụ²ʔti}|{ụ²t’i}|{ụʔti} ;

def GSY2Rules Verb [ 
	         ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gi ʔy} |
		 ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{da ʔy} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{xká ʔy} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:{xa ʔy}  |
		 ["[PRF]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{xkí ʔy} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{xki ʔy} |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gá ʔy}          |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{bi ʔy}] addGSY2 ;
